Vermont, session 2025-2026, S56.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. OFFICE OF NEW AMERICANS STUDY COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Office of New Americans Study
Committee to make recommendations for creating an independent Office of
New Americans.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Director of the Vermont Refugee Office, who shall be Chair;
(2) one member, appointed by the Commissioner of Labor;
(3) one member, appointed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Racial Equity; and
(4) six members, appointed by the Governor, one who must be a New
American with lived experience, who shall include:
(A) one member, nominated by the Association of Africans Living in
Vermont;
(B) one member, nominated by the U.S. Committee for Refugees and
Immigrants;
(C) one member, nominated by the Vermont Afghan Alliance;
(D) one member, nominated by the Brattleboro Development Credit
Corporation;
VT LEG #383931 v.1

No. 29 Page 2 of 4
2025
(E) one member, nominated by Migrant Justice; and
(F) one member, nominated by the Vermont State College System.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study and submit a written
report to the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development
and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on
Government Operations concerning recommendations for creating an
independent Office of New Americans, including:
(1) a summary of the current demographic, economic, and public health
data regarding New Americans in the State and information regarding the
government services being utilized and underutilized by New Americans;
(2) a summary or survey of varying and successful approaches to
providing government services to New Americans in other states, with
particular focus on the topics of the role of education and training institutions,
professional licensing, housing, and support for employers and municipalities;
(3) in consultation with community-based organizations composed of or
serving New Americans, the Vermont Asylum Assistance Project, State
agencies and departments that provide services to New Americans, the
Secretary of State’s Office, municipal government leaders, educational
institutions, and business leaders, information on:
VT LEG #383931 v.1

No. 29 Page 3 of 4
2025
(A) the existing State and local-level barriers for New Americans for
gainfully participating in the State’s workforce, economy, and business
communities;
(B) additional governmental services needed by New Americans but
not yet offered by the State; and
(C) the transfer or consolidation of existing governmental services
for New Americans that would be more efficiently provided by a new Office of
New Americans;
(4) the proposed structure, duties, funding, and labor needs of an Office
of New Americans; and
(5) a definition of the term “New Americans” for the purposes of an
Office of New Americans.
(d) The Committee may create subcommittees, with duties and leadership
to be assigned by the Chair.
(e) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Agency of Human Services.
(f) Date of Report. On or before September 1, 2026, the Committee shall
submit the written report required by subsection (c) of this section.
(g) Meetings.
(1) The Chair shall call the first meeting of the Committee to occur on
or before September 1, 2025.
(2) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
VT LEG #383931 v.1

No. 29 Page 4 of 4
2025
(3) The Committee shall cease to exist on the earlier of September 1,
2026 or the date that the Committee submits its written report.
(h) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Committee serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than 10
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than 10 meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Agency of Human Services.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 21, 2025
VT LEG #383931 v.1